Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 9. 2014 Large Project Funding

Effective date. —

Laws 2014, ch. 29, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 6, 2014.

§ 9-15-901.
Rim Ranch Conservation Easement. [Repealed]

History:

2014 ch. 29, § 1, effective March 6, 2014; repealed by 2019 ch. 75, § 2, effective February 26, 2019.

§ 9-15-902.
Yellowtail Fire Rehabilitation. [Repealed]

History:

2014 ch. 29, § 1, effective March 6, 2014; repealed by 2019 ch. 75, § 2, effective February 26, 2019.

§ 9-15-903.
Yellowstone Lake II. [Repealed]

History:

2014 ch. 29, § 1, effective March 6, 2014; repealed by 2019 ch. 75, § 2, effective February 26, 2019.

§ 9-15-904.
Wapiti Ridge Conservation Easement. [Repealed]

History:

2014 ch. 29, § 1, effective March 6, 2014; repealed by 2019 ch. 75, § 2, effective February 26, 2019.

§ 9-15-905.
Stateline Pike. [Repealed]

History:

2014 ch. 29, § 1, effective March 6, 2014; repealed by 2019 ch. 75, § 2, effective February 26, 2019.

§ 9-15-906.
Croonberg Ranch Conservation Easement. [Repealed]

History:

2014 ch. 29, § 1, effective March 6, 2014; repealed by 2021 ch. 13, § 2, effective February 8, 2021.

§ 9-15-907.
Platte River Casper II. [Repealed]

History:

2014 ch. 29, § 1, effective March 6, 2014; repealed by 2022 ch. 62, § 2, effective March 15, 2022.

§ 9-15-908.
Table Mountain Water II. [Repealed]

History:

2014 ch. 29, § 1, effective March 6, 2014; repealed by 2021 ch. 13, § 2, effective February 8, 2021.

§ 9-15-909.
Wyoming Range Mule Deer Habitat. [Repealed]

History:

2014 ch. 29, § 1, effective March 6, 2014; repealed by 2019 ch. 75, § 2, effective February 26, 2019.

§ 9-15-910.
Harmony Diversion. [Repealed]

History:

2014 ch. 29, § 1, effective March 6, 2014; repealed by 2021 ch. 13, § 2, effective February 8, 2021.

§ 9-15-911.
Purple Sage Ranch Conservation Easement. [Repealed]

History:

2014 ch. 29, § 1, effective March 6, 2014; repealed by 2021 ch. 13, § 2, effective February 8, 2021.